Hawaii, session 2026, SB2213.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: PART I SECTION 1.  This Act shall be known and be cited as the "Hawaii Environmentally Friendly Schools Act". SECTION 2. The legislature finds that the State's public schools generate large amounts of daily waste, much of which consists of single-use plastic food service items such as utensils, trays, and packaging.  National studies estimate that United States schools produce more than fourteen thousand tons of solid waste each day, with nearly half composed of disposable food materials.  The legislature believes that the continued use of these items in public schools contributes to plastic pollution that burdens the State's waste management systems and undermines efforts to promote sustainability in public facilities. The legislature further finds that plastic pollution poses a direct threat to the State's ocean resources, coastal ecosystems, and community well-being.  Reducing single-use plastics in schools will help the State fulfill its constitutional duty to conserve and protect the State's natural beauty and all natural resources for future generations. The legislature further finds that the State has taken significant steps in recent years to address climate change and promote environmental stewardship through statewide initiatives such as the establishment of a "green fee" tax on tourists to fund environmental protection and climate change resilience projects, the establishment of the Hawaii Climate Change Mitigation and Adaptation Commission, and the State's commitment to achieve net-zero emissions and one hundred per cent renewable energy by 2045.  These efforts reflect the State's recognition that local action is critical to protect its fragile ecosystems and island communities from the accelerating impacts of global climate change. The legislature believes that expanding sustainability practices within public schools complements these statewide initiatives by reducing waste, conserving energy, and cultivating environmental responsibility in the next generation.  Establishing environmentally friendly schools will ensure that public schools contribute directly to the State's long-term vision of climate resilience and ecological balance. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish an environmentally friendly schools initiative within the department of education to integrate environmental stewardship into school curricula, establish sustainability programs, phase out single-use plastics, and increase availability of water bottle filling stations on public school campuses. PART II SECTION 3.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II, subpart B, to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-    Environmental stewardship; curricula plan; public schools.  (a)  The department shall: (1)  Develop and implement a statewide environmental stewardship curricula plan for public school students in through       grade; and (2)  Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, ensure that each public school offers an environmental stewardship course during each school year. (b)  Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, each public school shall offer an environmental stewardship course for students in       through grade.  The curriculum shall emphasize: (1)  The protection and sustainable management of the State's natural resources, including land, water, air, minerals and energy sources; (2)  The reduction of pollution and waste; and (3)  The Hawaiian cultural value of malama aina as a guiding principle of environmental stewardship. (c)  By June 30, 2028, and by each June 30 thereafter, the superintendent shall report to the legislature and board on the environmental stewardship courses and content offered during the previous school year at the schools in each complex area." SECTION 4.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II, subpart C, to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-    Sustainability programs; recycling and composting.  (a)  Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, the department shall establish and administer sustainability programs, including recycling and composting programs, to be implemented at public schools to reduce solid waste and promote environmental stewardship among students. (b)  Each public school shall participate in the program or develop and implement a recycling and composting plan consistent with department guidelines. (c)  The department may provide funding, technical assistance, and educational materials to support program implementation and shall coordinate with county solid waste management agencies and nonprofit organizations to facilitate collection and processing. (d)  The department may adopt policies or rules to implement this section, including requirements for waste separation, collection, and reporting. (e)  The department shall submit an annual report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session, beginning with the regular session of 2028, that includes a summary of school participation, program expenditures, and waste diversion results achieved under this section." SECTION 5  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part VI, subpart A, to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-    Single-use plastic food service products; prohibited.  (a)  Beginning July 1, 2027, no public school shall distribute or use single-use plastic utensils, trays, straws, or other disposable plastic food service products in any school cafeteria. (b) The department may authorize limited exemptions if the department determines that a suitable nonplastic or reusable alternative is not reasonably available, or if the use of single-use plastic is necessary for health, safety, or disability-related accommodation. (c)  The department shall adopt policies and procedures to implement this section, including a timeline for the transition to reusable or compostable alternatives, standards for acceptable products, and guidance for schools on procurement and disposal practices. (d)  The department shall submit a report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2028 that includes the status of implementation, any exemptions granted, and recommendations for further reducing waste in public school food service operations." SECTION 6. (a)  The department of education shall increase the number of water bottle filling stations available on public school campuses to promote waste reduction and student health. (b) Beginning July 1, 2028, each public school shall have at least one operational water bottle filling station accessible to students and staff; provided that implementation shall be subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this purpose. (c) The department of education may contract with qualified vendors or public agencies for the design, procurement, installation, and maintenance of water bottle filling stations. (d) The department of education shall adopt policies to ensure stations are regularly maintained, sanitary, and accessible to students, and may prioritize installation at schools with the highest enrollment or limited access to potable water. (e) The department of education shall submit a report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2029 that includes the number of refillable water bottle filling stations installed, schools served, and progress toward statewide implementation. (f) For the purposes of this section, "water bottle filling station" means a plumbing fixture connected to the potable water distribution system and sanitary drainage system that is designed and intended for filling personal use drinking water bottles or containers at least ten inches in height.  A "water bottle filling station" may be separate from or integral to a drinking fountain and may incorporate a water filter and a cooling system for chilling the drinking water. PART III SECTION 7.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to be expended as follows: (1)  $ to establish public school sustainability programs, including recycling and composting programs; (2)  $ to implement the phase-out of single-use plastic food service products in public school cafeterias; and (3)  $ to procure and install water bottle filling stations in public schools. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 8. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 9.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________